de: Ventildeckelmaterial: Aluminium; Billet-Aluminium; Kohlefaser; Aluminiumguss; Verbundmaterial; Magnesium; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Stahl; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Materiál krytu ventilu: Hliník; Frézovaný hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Liaty hliník; Kompozit; Horčík; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Iné
nb: Dekselmateriale for ventil: Aluminium; Maskinert aluminium; Karbonfiber; Støpt aluminium; Kompositt; Magnesium; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Annet
pt-BR: Material de revestimento da válvula: Alumínio; Alumínio usinado (billet); Fibra de carbono; Alumínio fundido; Compósito; Magnésio; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
pl: Materiał osłony zaworu: Aluminium; Aluminium obrabiane CNC; Włókno węglowe; Aluminium odlewane; Kompozyt; Magnez; Plastik; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Inne
hr-HR: Materijal poklopca ventila: Aluminij; Gredičasti aluminij; Ugljična vlakna; Lijevani aluminij; Kompozitni materijal; Magnezij; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Ostalo
da: Materiale i ventildæksel: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Kulfiber; Støbt aluminium; Komposit; Magnesium; Plastik; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Andet
ro-RO: Material al capacului de supapă: Aluminiu; Aluminiu prelucrat; Fibră de carbon; Aluminiu turnat; Compozit; Magneziu; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Altele
zh-TW: 閥門蓋材質: 鋁; 鋁合金鋼坯; 碳纖維; 鑄鋁; 複合材質; 鎂; 塑膠; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 其他
pt-PT: Material da tampa da válvula: Alumínio; Alumínio maciço; Fibra de carbono; Alumínio fundido; Compósito; Magnésio; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
vi: Chất liệu nắp giàn cò: Nhôm; Nhôm nguyên khối; Sợi carbon; Nhôm đúc; Composite; Magiê; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Khác
en: Valve cover material: Aluminum; Billet aluminum; Carbon fiber; Cast aluminum; Composite; Magnesium; Plastic; Stainless steel; Steel; Other
cs: Materiál krytu veltilku: Hliník; Frézovaný hliník; Karbonové vlákno; Litý hliník; Kompozit; Hořčík; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Jiné
fi: Venttiilihatun materiaali: Alumiini; Billet-alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Valualumiini; Komposiitti; Magnesium; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Muu
zh-CN: 气门盖材质: 铝; 铝坯; 碳纤维; 铸铝; 复合材料; 镁; 塑料; 不锈钢; 钢; 其他
sv: Material för ventilkåpa: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Kolfiber; Gjuten aluminium; Komposit; Magnesium; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Övrigt
lt-LT: Vožtuvo dangalo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Frezuotas aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Lietas aliuminis; Kompozitas; Magnis; Plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Kita
el: Υλικό καλύμματος βαλβίδας: Αλουμίνιο; Billet αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακονήματα; Χυτό αλουμίνιο; Σύνθετο υλικό; Μαγνήσιο; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Άλλο
fr: Matériau du couvercle de soupape: Aluminium; Aluminium taillé dans la masse; Fibre de carbone; Fonte d’aluminium; Composite; Magnésium; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Autre
hu: Szelep bevonó anyaga: Alumínium; Forgácsolt alumínium; Szénszálas; Öntött alumínium; Kompozit; Magnézium; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Egyéb
es: Material de la cubierta de la válvula: Aluminio; Aluminio billet; Fibra de carbono; Aluminio fundido; Compuesto; Magnesio; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Otro
ko: 밸브 커버 소재: 알루미늄; 빌릿 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 주조 알루미늄; 합성물; 마그네슘; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 기타
sl-SI: Material pokrova ventilov: Aluminij; Rezkan aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Liti aluminij; Kompozit; Magnezij; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Drugo
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำฝาครอบวาล์ว: อะลูมิเนียม; อะลูมิเนียมบิลเล็ต; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; อะลูมิเนียมหล่อ; คอมโพสิต; แมกนีเซียม; พลาสติก; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
tr: Valf kapağı malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kütük alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Dökme alüminyum; Kompozit; Magnezyum; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Diğer
it: Materiale della copertura della valvola: Alluminio; Alluminio billet; Fibra di carbonio; Alluminio pressofuso; Materiale composito; Magnesio; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Altro
nl: Materiaal kleppendeksel: Aluminium; Billet-aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Gegoten aluminium; Composiet; Magnesium; Kunststof; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Overig
ru: Материал крышки клапана: Алюминий; Фрезерованный алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Литой алюминий; Композит; Магний; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Другое
ja: バルブカバー素材: アルミニウム; ビレットアルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; 鋳造アルミニウム; 複合材; マグネシウム; プラスチック; ステンレス鋼; スチール; その他
bg-BG: Материал на капака на клапана: Алуминий; Фрезован алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Лят алуминий; Композит; Магнезий; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Друго